Indiana, session 2026, HB1218.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-6-4.2-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) Each year in which a general or municipal
election is held, the election division shall call a meeting of all the
members of the county election boards, the boards of registration
(subject to IC 3-7-12), and the boards of elections and registration (as
defined in IC 3-5-2.1-12) to instruct them regarding all of the
following:
(1) Their duties under this title and federal law (including HAVA
and NVRA).
(2) Requirements and best practices concerning cybersecurity for
the computerized list, voting systems, and electronic poll books.
(3) Physical security for all aspects of the election process,
including voting systems, electronic poll books, absentee voting,
and polling places.
(4) Requirements and best practices to ensure that voting systems,
precinct polling places, and vote centers are accessible to voters
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


with disabilities.
(5) Best practices in answering voters' questions on how to vote.
including providing instructions to voters on straight ticket voting.
(b) The election division may call a meeting under this section:
(1) during a year in which a general or a municipal election is not
held; and
(2) at other times when the election division determines that doing
so is necessary or desirable.
(c) Each circuit court clerk, each member of a board of registration
established under IC 3-7-12, and each director, assistant director, or
co-director of a board of elections and registration shall attend a
meeting called by the election division under this section. A member
of a county election board may attend a meeting called by the election
division under this section. A circuit court clerk, member of a board of
registration, or member of a board of elections and registration may
require the attendance of the following:
(1) Each of the circuit court clerk's, board of registration
member's, or board of elections and registration member's
appointed and acting chief deputies or chief assistants with
election related responsibilities.
(2) If the number of deputies or assistants:
(A) is not more than three (3), one (1) of the clerk's or
member's appointed and acting deputies or assistants; or
(B) is greater than three (3), two (2) of the clerk's or member's
appointed and acting deputies or assistants.
(d) The election division shall set the time and place of the
instructional meeting. In years in which a primary election is held, the
election division:
(1) may conduct the meeting before the first day of the year; and
(2) shall conduct the meeting before primary election day.
The instructional meeting may not last for more than three (3) days.
(e) Each individual who attends the meeting under subsection (c)
and an individual who has been elected or selected to serve as circuit
court clerk but has not yet begun serving in that office is entitled to
receive all of the following from the county general fund without
appropriation:
(1) A sum for mileage at a rate determined by the fiscal body of
the unit the official represents for each mile necessarily traveled
in going to and returning from the meeting by the most
expeditious route. Regardless of the duration of the conference,
only one (1) mileage reimbursement shall be allowed to the
official furnishing the conveyance even if the official transports
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


more than one (1) person.
(2) An allowance for lodging for each night preceding conference
attendance in an amount equal to the single room rate. However,
lodging expense, in the case of a one (1) day conference, shall
only be allowed for persons who reside fifty (50) miles or farther
from the conference location.
(3) Reimbursement of an official, a deputy, or an assistant in an
amount determined by the fiscal body of the unit the official,
deputy, or assistant represents, for meals purchased while
attending a conference called under this section.
(f) The election division shall certify the number of days of
attendance and the mileage for each conference to each official, deputy,
or assistant attending any conference under this section.
(g) All payments of mileage and lodging shall be made by the
proper disbursing officer in the manner provided by law on a duly
verified claim or voucher to which shall be attached the certificate of
the election division showing the number of days attended and the
number of miles traveled. All payments shall be made from the county
general fund from any money not otherwise appropriated and without
any previous appropriation being made therefore.
(h) A claim for reimbursement under this section may not be denied
by the body responsible for the approval of claims if the claim complies
with IC 5-11-10-1.6 and this section.
SECTION 2. IC 3-10-7-32, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2011,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 32. (a) A town election board shall determine
what voting method will be used in a municipal election.
(b) The town election board and its precinct election officers shall
perform the duties of the county election board and its precinct election
officers under IC 3-11 for each voting method used.
(c) The town election board shall prepare the ballots in the form
prescribed by IC 3-11 and distribute them to the precincts in the town.
(d) This subsection applies only to paper ballots. Notwithstanding
subsection (c), the town election board, by unanimous consent of the
board's entire membership, may authorize the printing or reproduction
of ballots on equipment under the control of the town clerk-treasurer.
If the town election board acts under this subsection, the ballots are not
required to conform to the precise dimensions concerning the size of
political party devices under IC 3-11-2-9 or the placement of a
candidate's name under IC 3-11-2-10(f). IC 3-11-2-10(d). However,
the ballots must otherwise substantially conform with IC 3-11-2.
SECTION 3. IC 3-11-2-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The device of each political party described
in section 6 of this chapter shall be:
(1) enclosed in a circle not less than three-fourths (3/4) of an inch
in diameter; and
(2) placed under the name of the party or independent ticket, as
required by section 10 of this chapter.
(b) A device of a political party must not be printed on a ballot if
(1) there are no candidates of that political party. or
(2) the only candidates:
(A) of the political party; or
(B) that have stated an affiliation with the political party under
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5);
are for election to school board offices or offices to which more
than one (1) individual is to be elected and which will not be
credited with a vote under IC 3-12-1-7 or IC 3-12-1-7.1 if a voter
casts a straight party ticket.
SECTION 4. IC 3-11-2-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) Public questions shall be placed on the
general election ballot in the following order after the statement
described in section 7 of this chapter, and the instructions described in
subsections (d) and (e) subsection (c) and section 8 of this chapter, if
instructions are printed on the ballot:
(1) Ratification of a state constitutional amendment.
(2) Local public questions.
Subject to section 10.1 of this chapter, each public question shall be
placed in a separate column on the ballot.
(b) The name or title of the political party shall be placed on the
general election ballot after the public questions described in
subsection (a). The device of the political party shall be placed
immediately under the name of the political party. Notwithstanding
section 8(b) of this chapter, the instructions for voting a straight party
ticket shall be placed to the right of the device on the ballot.
(c) The instructions for voting a straight party ticket must conform
as nearly as possible to the following:
"(1) You are not required to vote a straight party ticket. If you do
not wish to vote a straight party ticket, do not make a mark in this
section, and proceed to voting the ballot by office.
(2) To vote a straight (insert political party name) ticket for all
(insert political party name) candidates on this ballot, except for
candidates described in (3) below, make a voting mark on or in
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


this circle and do not make any other marks on this ballot.
(3) To vote for any candidate for:
(A) an at-large office (insert county council, city common
council, town council, or township board if those offices
appear on this ballot) to which more than one (1) person may
be elected; or
(B) a school board office;
you must make another voting mark for each candidate you wish
to vote for. Your straight party vote will not count as a vote for
any candidate for that office.
(4) If you wish to vote for a candidate seeking a nonpartisan office
or on a public question, you must make another voting mark on
the appropriate place on this ballot.".
(d) Except as permitted under section 8(b) of this chapter, if the
ballot contains an independent ticket described in section 6 of this
chapter and at least one (1) other independent candidate, the ballot
must also contain a statement that reads substantially as follows: "A
vote cast for an independent ticket will only be counted for the
candidates for President and Vice President or governor and lieutenant
governor comprising that independent ticket. This vote will NOT be
counted for any OTHER independent candidate appearing on the
ballot.".
(e) (c) Except as permitted under section 8(b) of this chapter, the
ballot must also contain a statement that reads substantially as follows:
"A write-in vote will NOT be counted unless the vote is for a
DECLARED write-in candidate. To vote for a write-in candidate, you
must make a voting mark on or in the square to the left of the name you
have written in or your vote will not be counted.".
(f) (d) Subject to section 10.1 of this chapter, the list of candidates
of the political party shall be placed immediately under the instructions
for voting a straight party ticket. The names of the candidates shall be
placed three-fourths (3/4) of an inch apart from center to center of the
name. The name of each candidate must have, immediately on its left,
a square three-eighths (3/8) of an inch on each side.
(g) (e) The circuit court clerk may authorize the printing of ballots
containing a ballot variation code to ensure that the proper version of
a ballot is used within a precinct.
SECTION 5. IC 3-11-2-12.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2021,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.4. (a) This section applies whenever more than
one (1) candidate may be elected to an office.
(b) The office shall be placed on the general election ballot after the
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


offices described in section 12 of this chapter and before the offices
described in section 12.9 of this chapter.
(c) Whenever candidates are to be elected to a county council, city
common council, or town council that includes both an at-large
member and a member representing a district, the candidates seeking
election as an at-large member shall be placed on the ballot before
candidates seeking to represent a district.
(d) The ballot shall contain a statement reading substantially as
follows above the name of the first candidate: "To vote for any
candidate for this office, you must make a voting mark for each
candidate you wish to vote for.". A straight party vote will not count as
a vote for any candidate for this office.".
SECTION 6. IC 3-11-2-12.9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.9. (a) School board offices to be elected at the
general election shall be placed on the general election ballot after the
offices described in section 12.4 of this chapter.
(b) If the ballot contains a candidate for a school board office, the
ballot must also contain a statement that reads substantially as follows:
"To vote for a candidate for this office, make a voting mark on or in the
square to the left of the candidate's name.". A straight party vote will
not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.".
(c) Whenever candidates are to be elected to a school board office
that includes both an at-large member and a member representing a
district, the candidates seeking election as an at-large member shall be
placed on the ballot before candidates seeking to represent a district.
SECTION 7. IC 3-11-7-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), A
ballot card voting system must permit a voter to vote
(1) except at a primary election, a straight party ticket for all of
the candidates of one (1) political party by a single voting mark
on each ballot card;
(2) for one (1) or more candidates of each political party or
independent candidates, or for one (1) or more school board
candidates nominated by petition.
(3) a split ticket for the candidates of different political parties
and for independent candidates; or
(4) a straight party ticket and then split that ticket by casting
individual votes for candidates of another political party or
independent candidate.
(b) A ballot card voting system must require that a voter who wishes
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


to cast a ballot for a candidate for election to a school board office or
an at-large district to which more than one (1) person may be elected,
on a:
(1) county council;
(2) city common council;
(3) town council; or
(4) township board;
make a voting mark for each individual candidate for whom the voter
wishes to cast a vote. The ballot card voting system may not count any
straight party ticket voting mark as a vote for any candidate for an
office described by this subsection.
(c) (b) A ballot card voting system must permit a voter to vote:
(1) for all candidates for presidential electors and alternate
presidential electors of a political party or an independent ticket
by making a single voting mark; and
(2) for or against a public question on which the voter may vote.
SECTION 8. IC 3-11-7-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 6. Subject to IC 3-12-1-7.1, a ballot card voting system
must count a ballot in accordance with IC 3-12-1-7 when a voter votes
a straight ticket vote and votes for individual candidates as described
by IC 3-12-1-7.
SECTION 9. IC 3-11-7.5-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), An
electronic voting system must permit a voter to vote
(1) except at a primary election, a straight party ticket for all the
candidates of one (1) political party by touching the device of that
party;
(2) for one (1) or more candidates of each political party or
independent candidates, or for one (1) or more school board
candidates nominated by petition.
(3) a split ticket for the candidates of different political parties
and for independent candidates; or
(4) a straight party ticket and then split that ticket by casting
individual votes for candidates of another political party or
independent candidates.
(b) An electronic voting system must require that a voter who
wishes to cast a ballot for a candidate for election to a school board
office or an at-large district to which more than one (1) person may be
elected, on a:
(1) county council;
(2) city common council;
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(3) town council; or
(4) township board;
make a voting mark for each individual candidate for whom the voter
wishes to cast a vote. The electronic voting system may not count any
straight party ticket voting mark as a vote for any candidate for an
office described by this subsection.
(c) (b) An electronic voting system must permit a voter to vote:
(1) for as many candidates for an office as the voter may vote for,
but no more;
(2) for or against a public question on which the voter may vote,
but no other; and
(3) for all the candidates for presidential electors and alternate
presidential electors of a political party or an independent ticket
by making a single voting mark.
SECTION 10. IC 3-11-11-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 10. If an election is a general or municipal election and
a voter desires to vote for all the candidates of one (1) political party or
group of petitioners, the voter may make a voting mark on or in a large
circle enclosing the device and before the name under which the
candidates of the party are printed. The voter's vote shall then be
counted for all the candidates under that party name.
SECTION 11. IC 3-11-13-7.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.109-2021,
SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) This section applies to a marking device
used in a voting system that:
(1) contains features of both a ballot card voting system and an
electronic voting system; and
(2) produces a ballot card with the voter's choices as selected by
the voter and marked on the card by the device.
(b) The interface of the marking device used with an optical scan
voting system must include all of the following:
(1) The information required by IC 3-11-14-3.5.
(2) The instructions required by IC 3-11-2-8.
(3) The information and instructions required by IC 3-11-2-10.
(c) A marking device must comply with the same disability access
standards as an electronic voting system under IC 3-11-15-13.6.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a ballot card
used with a marking device must have either preprinted or printed by
the marking device the following:
(1) When the marking device is used for absentee voting under
IC 3-11-10-26, the circuit court clerk's signature and seal required
by IC 3-11-10-27.
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(2) When the marking device is used by a voter to cast a
provisional ballot, the circuit court clerk's signature and seal
required by IC 3-11.7-1-7.
(3) A line or box for each poll clerk's initial as required by section
19 of this chapter.
(4) When the marking device is used during a primary election,
the name of the political party whose primary the voter is
participating in or the word "nonpartisan" if the voter is voting a
ballot that contains only a public question certified by the county
election board under IC 3-10-9.
(e) If the voting system produces a ballot card, the ballot card must
contain a summary ballot scan of the voter's ballot that includes all of
the following:
(1) The name or designation of each office on the voter's ballot.
(2) The name of the candidate and the candidate's political party
selected by the voter.
(3) If the voter selects a straight party ticket, the name of the
political party ticket the voter selected.
(4) (3) A description of the text of any public question or judicial
retention question on the voter's ballot that the county election
board determines reasonably conveys the content of the public
question or judicial retention question and the response the voter
selected for each question.
The ballot card may contain additional information described in
subsection (b).
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a ballot card
used with the marking device may be a different dimension or size than
other ballot cards:
(1) approved by the county election board for use in an election;
and
(2) that are not designed to be marked by the marking device.
(g) A voter verifiable paper audit trail is not a marking device.
SECTION 12. IC 3-11-13-11, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The ballot information, whether placed on
the ballot card or on the marking device, must be in the order of
arrangement provided for ballots under this section.
(b) Each county election board shall have the names of all
candidates for all elected offices, political party offices, and public
questions printed on a ballot card as provided in this chapter. The
county may:
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(1) print all offices and questions on a single ballot card; and
(2) include a ballot variation code to ensure that the proper
version of a ballot is used within a precinct.
(c) Each type of ballot card must be of uniform size and of the same
quality and color of paper (except as permitted under IC 3-10-1-17).
(d) The nominees of a political party or an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6) nominated by
petitioners shall be listed on the ballot with the name and device set
forth on the certification or petition. The circle containing the device
may be of any size that permits a voter to readily identify the device.
IC 3-11-2-5 applies if the certification or petition does not include a
name or device, or if the same device is selected by two (2) or more
parties or petitioners. In the case of a candidate described in
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), a blank space must be printed after the
candidate's name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any
affiliation with a political party or that the candidate:
(1) is not affiliated with a political party; and
(2) does not identify as an independent candidate.
(e) The offices and public questions on the general election ballot
must be placed on the ballot in the order listed in IC 3-11-2-12,
IC 3-11-2-12.4, IC 3-11-2-12.5, IC 3-11-2-12.7(b), IC 3-11-2-12.9(a),
IC 3-11-2-12.9(c), IC 3-11-2-13(a) through IC 3-11-2-13(c),
IC 3-11-2-14(a), IC 3-11-2-14(d), and IC 3-11-2-14(e). The offices and
public questions may be listed in a continuous column or row either
vertically or horizontally and on a number of separate pages.
(f) The name of each office must be printed in a uniform size in bold
type. A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate:
(1) "Vote for one (1) only.", if only one (1) candidate is to be
elected to the office.
(2) "Vote for not more than (insert the number of candidates to be
elected) candidate(s) for this office. To vote for any candidate for
this office, you must make a voting mark for each candidate you
wish to vote for.", A straight party vote will not count as a vote for
any candidate for this office.", if more than one (1) candidate is to
be elected to the office.
(3) "Vote for one (1) only. A straight party vote will not count as
a vote for any candidate for this office.", if only one (1) candidate
is to be elected to a school board office.
(g) Below the name of the office and the statement required by
subsection (f), the names of the candidates for each office must be
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


grouped together in the following order:
(1) The major political party whose candidate received the highest
greatest number of votes in the county for secretary of state at the
last most recent election for secretary of state is listed first.
(2) The major political party whose candidate received the second
highest greatest number of votes in the county for secretary of
state at the most recent election for secretary of state is listed
second.
(3) All other political parties listed in the order that the parties'
candidates for secretary of state finished in the last most recent
election for secretary of state are listed after the party listed in
subdivision (2).
(4) If a political party did not have a candidate for secretary of
state in the last most recent election for secretary of state or a
nominee is an independent candidate or independent ticket
(described in IC 3-11-2-6), the party or candidate is listed after
the parties described in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3).
(5) If more than one (1) political party or independent candidate
or ticket described in subdivision (4) qualifies to be on the ballot,
the parties, candidates, or tickets are listed in the order in which
the party filed its petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6-12.
(6) The name of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C)
is placed after the candidates listed in subdivisions (1) through
(5), if applicable.
(7) A space for write-in voting is placed after the candidates listed
in subdivisions (1) through (6), if required by law.
(8) The name of a write-in candidate may not be listed on the
ballot.
(h) The names of the candidates grouped in the order established by
subsection (g) must be printed in type with uniform capital letters and
have a uniform space between each name. The name of the candidate's
political party, or the word "Independent" if the:
(1) candidate; or
(2) ticket of candidates for:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States; or
(B) governor and lieutenant governor;
is independent, must be placed immediately below or beside the name
of the candidate and must be printed in a uniform size and type. In the
case of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), the name of
the candidate must be printed with a blank space after the candidate's
name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any affiliation
with a political party or that the candidate is not affiliated with a
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


political party and does not identify as an independent candidate.
(i) All the candidates of the same political party for election to
at-large seats on the fiscal or legislative body of a political subdivision
must be grouped together:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
(2) in the order established by subsection (g); and
(3) within the political party, in alphabetical order according to
surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) of ANY party for this office.".
(j) Candidates for election to at-large seats on the governing body
of a school corporation must be grouped:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
and
(2) in alphabetical order according to surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) for this office.". A straight party
vote will not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.".
(k) The following information must be placed at the top of the ballot
before the first public question is listed:
(1) The cautionary statement described in IC 3-11-2-7.
(2) The instructions described in IC 3-11-2-8 IC 3-11-2-10(d),
and IC 3-11-2-10(e). IC 3-11-2-10(c).
(l) The ballot must include: a single connectable arrow, circle, oval,
or square, or a voting position for voting a straight party ticket by one
(1) mark as required by section 14 of this chapter, and the single
connectable arrow, circle, oval, or square, or the voting position for
casting a straight party ticket ballot must be identified by:
(1) the name of the political party; and
(2) immediately below or beside the political party's name, the
device of that party (described in IC 3-11-2-5).
The name and device of each political party must be of uniform size
and type and arranged in the order established by subsection (g) for
listing candidates under each office. The instructions described in
IC 3-11-2-10(c) for voting a straight party ticket and the statement
concerning presidential electors required under IC 3-10-4-3 must be
placed on the ballot label. The instructions for voting a straight party
ticket must include the statement: "If you do not wish to vote a straight
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


party ticket, do not make a mark in this section and proceed to voting
the ballot by office.".
(m) A public question must be in the form described in
IC 3-11-2-15(a) and IC 3-11-2-15(b), except that a single connectable
arrow, a circle, or an oval may be used instead of a square. Except as
expressly authorized or required by statute, a county election board
may not print a ballot card that contains language concerning the public
question other than the language authorized by a statute.
(n) The requirements in this section:
(1) do not replace; and
(2) are in addition to;
any other requirements in this title that apply to optical scan ballots.
(o) The procedure described in IC 3-11-2-16 must be used when a
ballot does not comply with the requirements imposed by this title or
contains another error or omission that might result in confusion or
mistakes by voters.
(p) This subsection applies to an optical scan ballot that does not
list:
(1) the names of political parties or candidates; or
(2) the text of public questions;
on the face of the ballot. The ballot must be prepared in accordance
with this section, except that the ballot must include a numbered circle
or oval to refer to each political party, candidate, or public question.
SECTION 13. IC 3-11-13-14 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 14. (a) In partisan elections, the ballot labels must
include a voting square or position where a voter may by one (1) voting
mark on each card record a straight party ticket vote for all the
candidates of one (1) political party, except for offices for which the
voter:
(1) is required to cast an individual vote for a candidate under
IC 3-11-7-4(b); or
(2) has voted individually for a candidate for any other office.
(b) A ballot label must not include a voting square or position to
permit a voter to cast a straight party ticket for a political party if:
(1) there are no candidates of that political party; or
(2) the only candidates:
(A) of the political party; or
(B) that have stated an affiliation with the political party under
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5);
are for election to school board offices or offices to which more
than one (1) individual is to be elected and which will not be
credited with a vote under IC 3-12-1-7 or IC 3-12-1-7.1 if a voter
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


casts a straight party ticket.
SECTION 14. IC 3-11-13-22, AS AMENDED BY P.L.212-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) This section applies to:
(1) a ballot card voting system; and
(2) a voting system that includes features of a ballot card voting
system and a direct record electronic voting system.
(b) Not later than seventy-four (74) days before election day, for
each county planning to use automatic tabulating machines at the next
election, VSTOP shall provide each county election board with a
randomly sorted list of unique identification numbers for the inventory
of machines in the county maintained under IC 3-11-16-4. Starting at
the top of the list, the county election board shall select machines in the
list in the order listed so that:
(1) if a machine to be selected in the list is not scheduled to be
used in the upcoming election, the selection process will move to
the next machine in the order listed;
(2) each selected machine is scheduled to be used in the
upcoming election; and
(3) the number of machines selected is not less than five percent
(5%) of the machines in the county scheduled by the county
election board to be used in the upcoming election.
(c) The county election board shall test the machines as described
in subsection (b) to ascertain that the machines will correctly do the
following:
(1) Count the votes cast for straight party tickets, for all
candidates (including write-in candidates), and on all public
questions.
(2) retract an absentee ballot card of a voter who is later found
disqualified or whose ballot may not be counted, in accordance
with IC 3-11.5-4-6, before the voter's ballot is tabulated.
If an individual attending the public test requests that additional
automatic tabulating machines be tested, then the county election board
shall select and test additional machines from the list in the manner
described in subsection (b).
(d) If VSTOP does not provide the lists under subsection (b) not
later than sixty (60) days before the election, the county election board
shall establish and implement a procedure for random selection of not
less than five percent (5%) of the machines in the county to be used in
the upcoming election. The county election board shall then test the
machines selected as described in subsection (c).
(e) Not later than seven (7) days after conducting the test under
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


subsection (c), the county election board shall certify to the election
division that the test has been conducted in conformity with subsection
(c). The testing under subsection (c) must begin before absentee voting
begins in the office of the circuit court clerk under IC 3-11-10-26.
(f) Public notice of the time and place shall be given at least
forty-eight (48) hours before the test. The notice shall be published
once in accordance with IC 5-3-1-4.
(g) If a county election board determines that:
(1) a ballot:
(A) must be reprinted or corrected as provided by
IC 3-11-2-16 because of the omission of a candidate, political
party, or public question from the ballot; or
(B) is an absentee ballot that a voter is entitled to recast under
IC 3-11.5-4-2 because the absentee ballot includes a candidate
for election to office who:
(i) ceased to be a candidate; and
(ii) has been succeeded by a candidate selected under
IC 3-13-1 or IC 3-13-2; and
(2) ballots used in the test conducted under this section were not
reprinted or corrected to remove the omission of a candidate,
political party, or public question, or indicate the name of the
successor candidate;
the county election board shall conduct an additional public test
described in subsection (c) using the reprinted or corrected ballots.
Notice of the time and place of the additional test shall be given in
accordance with IC 5-14-1.5, but publication of the notice in
accordance with IC 5-3-1-4 is not required.
(h) Notwithstanding IC 3-5-4-1.7, a county election board may send
a signed form from a public test to the election division by electronic
mail or fax.
SECTION 15. IC 3-11-13-31.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2023,
SECTION 99, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 31.7. (a) This section is enacted to comply with
52 U.S.C. 21081 by establishing uniform and nondiscriminatory
standards to define what constitutes a vote on an optical scan voting
system.
(b) After receiving ballot cards, a voter shall, without leaving the
room, go alone into one (1) of the booths or compartments that is
unoccupied and indicate:
(1) the candidates for whom the voter desires to vote by marking
the connectable arrows, circles, ovals, or squares immediately
beside:
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(A) the candidates' names; or
(B) the numbers referring to the candidates; and
(2) the voter's preference on each public question by marking the
connectable arrow, oval, or square beside:
(A) the word "yes" or "no" under the question; or
(B) the number referring to the word "yes" or "no" on the
ballot.
(c) If an election is a general or municipal election and a voter
desires to vote for all the candidates of one (1) political party, the voter
may mark:
(1) the circle enclosing the device; or
(2) the connectable arrow, circle, oval, or square described in
section 11 of this chapter;
that designates the candidates of that political party. Except as provided
by IC 3-11-7-4(b), the voter's vote shall then be counted for all the
candidates of that political party. However, if the voter marks the
circle, arrow, oval, or square of an independent ticket (described in
IC 3-11-2-6), the vote shall not be counted for any other independent
candidate on the ballot.
(d) (c) This subsection applies to a voter casting a ballot on a voting
system that includes features of both an optical scan ballot card voting
system and a direct record electronic voting system. After entering into
a booth used with the voting system, the voter shall indicate the
candidates for whom the voter desires to vote and the voter's preference
on each public question by:
(1) inserting a paper ballot or an optical scan ballot into the voting
system; or
(2) using headphones to listen to a recorded list of political
parties, candidates, and public questions.
(e) (d) A voter using a voting system described in subsection (d) (c)
may indicate the voter's selections by:
(1) touching a device on or in the squares immediately adjacent
to the name of a political party, candidate, or response to a public
question; or
(2) indicating the voter's choices by using a sip puff device that
enables the voter to indicate a choice by inhaling or exhaling.
SECTION 16. IC 3-11-14-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.115-2022,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c) and
(f), a county election board may use an approved electronic voting
system:
(1) in any election;
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(2) in all or in some of the precincts within a political subdivision
holding an election; and
(3) instead of or in combination with any other voting method.
(b) A county election board may use an electronic voting system
which includes a voter verifiable paper audit trail if the voting system:
(1) otherwise complies with this chapter and IC 3-11-15; and
(2) is certified by the Indiana election commission.
(c) A county election board may not use an approved electronic
voting system purchased, leased, or otherwise acquired by the county
after December 31, 2019, unless the system:
(1) is certified by the Indiana election commission; and
(2) includes a voter verifiable paper audit trail.
This subsection does not prohibit a county election board from having
maintenance performed on an electronic voting system purchased,
leased, or otherwise acquired by the county before January 1, 2020.
(d) The voter verifiable paper audit trail must contain all of the
following:
(1) The name or code of the election as provided by the voting
system.
(2) The date of the election.
(3) The date the voter verifiable paper audit trail was printed.
(4) A security code and record number specific to each paper
receipt assigned by the voting system.
(5) The name or designation of the voter's precinct.
(6) The name or designation of each office on the voter's ballot.
(7) The name of the candidate and the designation of the
candidate's political party selected by the voter.
(8) If the voter selects a straight party ticket, the name of the
political party ticket the voter selected.
(9) (8) The following information:
(A) A description of the text of any public question or judicial
retention question on the voter's ballot that:
(i) contains not more than thirty (30) characters; and
(ii) the county election board determines reasonably conveys
the content of the public question or judicial retention
question.
(B) The response the voter selected for each question.
(e) The voter verifiable paper audit trail may contain additional
information and instructions determined to be useful to the voter by the
county election board subject to the design capabilities of the voter
verifiable paper audit trail.
(f) This subsection applies to a county in which any direct record
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


electronic voting system that does not include a voter verifiable paper
audit trail is used for an election. A county election board shall not use
a direct record electronic voting system in an election after July 1,
2022, unless the county election board:
(1) uses a number of direct record electronic voting systems
including a voter verifiable paper audit trail in the election that is
equal to or greater than ten percent (10%) of the total number of
direct record electronic voting systems owned, leased, or
otherwise available to the county as of January 1, 2022, and as of
January 1 in each year thereafter;
(2) determines, not later than July 1, 2022, and January 1 of each
year thereafter, the minimum number of direct record electronic
voting systems including a voter verifiable paper audit trail
necessary to comply with the requirement of this subsection; and
(3) files a certification of this determination to the secretary of
state not later than August 11, 2022, and February 11 of each year
thereafter.
SECTION 17. IC 3-11-14-3.5, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) Each county election board shall have the
names of all candidates for all elected offices, political party offices,
and public questions printed on ballot labels for use in an electronic
voting system as provided in this chapter.
(b) The county may:
(1) print all offices and public questions on a single ballot label;
and
(2) include a ballot variation code to ensure that the proper
version of a ballot label is used within a precinct.
(c) Each type of ballot label must be of uniform size and of the same
quality and color of paper (except as permitted under IC 3-10-1-17).
(d) The nominees of a political party or an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6) nominated by
petitioners must be listed on the ballot label with the name and device
set forth on the certification or petition. The circle containing the
device may be of any size that permits a voter to readily identify the
device. IC 3-11-2-5 applies if the certification or petition does not
include a name or device, or if the same device is selected by two (2)
or more parties or petitioners. In the case of a candidate described in
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), a blank space must be printed after the
candidate's name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any
affiliation with a political party or that the candidate:
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(1) is not affiliated with a political party; and
(2) does not identify as an independent candidate.
(e) The ballot labels must list the offices and public questions on the
general election ballot in the order listed in IC 3-11-2-12,
IC 3-11-2-12.4, IC 3-11-2-12.5, IC 3-11-2-12.7(b), IC 3-11-2-12.9(a),
IC 3-11-2-12.9(c), IC 3-11-2-13(a) through IC 3-11-2-13(c),
IC 3-11-2-14(a), IC 3-11-2-14(d), and IC 3-11-2-14(e). Each office and
public question may have a separate screen, or the offices and public
questions may be listed in a continuous column either vertically or
horizontally.
(f) The name of each office must be printed in a uniform size in bold
type. A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate:
(1) "Vote for one (1) only.", if only one (1) candidate is to be
elected to the office.
(2) "Vote for not more than (insert the number of candidates to be
elected) candidate(s) for this office. To vote for any candidate for
this office, you must make a voting mark for each candidate you
wish to vote for.", A straight party vote will not count as a vote for
any candidate for this office.", if more than one (1) candidate is to
be elected to the office.
(3) "Vote for one (1) only. A straight party vote will not count as
a vote for any candidate for this office.", if only one (1) candidate
is to be elected to a school board office.
(g) Below the name of the office and the statement required by
subsection (f), the names of the candidates for each office must be
grouped together in the following order:
(1) The major political party whose candidate received the highest
greatest number of votes in the county for secretary of state at the
last most recent election for secretary of state is listed first.
(2) The major political party whose candidate received the second
highest greatest number of votes in the county for secretary of
state at the most recent election for secretary of state is listed
second.
(3) All other political parties listed in the order that the parties'
candidates for secretary of state finished in the last most recent
election for secretary of state are listed after the party listed in
subdivision (2).
(4) If a political party did not have a candidate for secretary of
state in the last most recent election for secretary of state or a
nominee is an independent candidate or independent ticket
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(described in IC 3-11-2-6), the party or candidate is listed after
the parties described in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3).
(5) If more than one (1) political party or independent candidate
or ticket described in subdivision (4) qualifies to be on the ballot,
the parties, candidates, or tickets are listed in the order in which
the party filed its petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6-12.
(6) The name of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C)
is placed after the candidates listed in subdivisions (1) through
(5), if applicable.
(7) A space for write-in voting is placed after the candidates listed
in subdivisions (1) through (6), if required by law. A space for
write-in voting for an office is not required if there are no
declared write-in candidates for that office. However, procedures
must be implemented to permit write-in voting for candidates for
federal offices.
(8) The name of a write-in candidate may not be listed on the
ballot.
(h) The names of the candidates grouped in the order established by
subsection (g) must be printed in type with uniform capital letters and
have a uniform space between each name. The name of the candidate's
political party, or the word "Independent", if the:
(1) candidate; or
(2) ticket of candidates for:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States; or
(B) governor and lieutenant governor;
is independent, must be placed immediately below or beside the name
of the candidate and must be printed in uniform size and type. In the
case of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), the name of
the candidate must be printed with a blank space after the candidate's
name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any affiliation
with a political party or that the candidate is not affiliated with a
political party and does not identify as an independent candidate.
(i) All the candidates of the same political party for election to
at-large seats on the fiscal or legislative body of a political subdivision
must be grouped together:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
(2) in the party order established by subsection (g); and
(3) within the political party, in alphabetical order according to
surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


candidates to be elected) candidate(s) of ANY party for this office.".
(j) Candidates for election to at-large seats on the governing body
of a school corporation must be grouped:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
and
(2) in alphabetical order according to surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) for this office.". A straight party
vote will not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.".
(k) The cautionary statement described in IC 3-11-2-7 must be
placed at the top or beginning of the ballot label before the first public
question is listed.
(l) The instructions described in IC 3-11-2-8 IC 3-11-2-10(d), and
IC 3-11-2-10(e) IC 3-11-2-10(c) may be:
(1) placed on the ballot label; or
(2) posted in a location within the voting booth that permits the
voter to easily read the instructions.
(m) Except as provided in section 14.5 of this chapter, The ballot
label must include: a touch sensitive point or button for voting a
straight political party ticket by one (1) touch, and the touch sensitive
point or button must be identified by:
(1) the name of the political party; and
(2) immediately below or beside the political party's name, the
device of that party (described in IC 3-11-2-5).
The name and device of each party must be of uniform size and type,
and arranged in the order established by subsection (g) for listing
candidates under each office. The instructions described in
IC 3-11-2-10(c) for voting a straight party ticket and the statement
concerning presidential electors required under IC 3-10-4-3 must be
placed on the ballot label. The instructions for voting a straight party
ticket must include the statement: "If you do not wish to vote a straight
party ticket, press "NEXT" (or replace "NEXT" with the term used by
that voting system to permit a voter to skip a ballot screen) to continue
voting.".
(n) A public question must be in the form described in
IC 3-11-2-15(a) and IC 3-11-2-15(b), except that a touch sensitive
point or button must be used instead of a square. Except as expressly
authorized or required by statute, a county election board may not print
a ballot label that contains language concerning the public question
other than the language authorized by a statute.
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(o) The requirements in this section:
(1) do not replace; and
(2) are in addition to;
any other requirements in this title that apply to ballots for electronic
voting systems.
(p) The procedure described in IC 3-11-2-16 must be used when a
ballot label does not comply with the requirements imposed by this title
or contains another error or omission that might result in confusion or
mistakes by voters.
SECTION 18. IC 3-11-14-14.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 14.5. A ballot label must not include a touch sensitive
point or button to permit a voter to cast a straight party ticket for a
political party if:
(1) there are no candidates of that political party; or
(2) the only candidates:
(A) of the political party; or
(B) that have stated an affiliation with the political party under
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5);
are for election to school board offices or offices to which more
than one (1) individual is to be elected and which will not be
credited with a vote under IC 3-12-1-7 or IC 3-12-1-7.1 if a voter
casts a straight party ticket.
SECTION 19. IC 3-11-14-23, AS AMENDED BY P.L.21-2016,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. (a) This section is enacted to comply with 52
U.S.C. 21081 by establishing uniform and nondiscriminatory standards
to define what constitutes a vote on an electronic voting system.
(b) If a voter is not challenged by a member of the precinct election
board, the voter may pass the railing to the side where an electronic
voting system is and into the voting booth. There the voter shall
register the voter's vote in secret by indicating:
(1) the candidates for whom the voter desires to vote by touching
a device on or in the squares immediately above the candidates'
names;
(2) if the voter intends to cast a write-in vote, a write-in vote by
touching a device on or in the square immediately below the
candidates' names and printing the name of the candidate in the
window provided for write-in voting; and
(3) the voter's preference on each public question by touching a
device above the word "yes" or "no" under the question.
(c) If an election is a general or municipal election and a voter
desires to vote for all the candidates of one (1) political party or group
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


of petitioners, the voter may cast a straight party ticket by touching that
party's device. Except as provided in IC 3-11-7.5-10(b), the voter's vote
shall then be counted for all the candidates under that name. However,
if the voter casts a vote by touching the circle of an independent ticket
comprised of two (2) candidates, the vote shall not be counted for any
other independent candidate on the ballot.
(d) (c) As provided by 52 U.S.C. 21081, a voter casting a ballot on
an electronic voting system must be:
(1) permitted to verify in a private and independent manner the
votes selected by the voter before the ballot is cast and counted;
(2) provided the opportunity to change the ballot or correct any
error in a private and independent manner before the ballot is cast
and counted, including the opportunity to receive a replacement
ballot if the voter is otherwise unable to change or correct the
ballot; and
(3) notified before the ballot is cast regarding the effect of casting
multiple votes for the office and provided an opportunity to
correct the ballot before the ballot is cast and counted.
SECTION 20. IC 3-11-14.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2020,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Not later than seventy-four (74) days before
election day, for each county planning to use an electronic voting
system at the next election, VSTOP shall provide each county election
board with a randomly sorted list of unique identification numbers for
the inventory of machines in the county maintained under
IC 3-11-16-4. Starting at the top of the list, the county election board
shall select machines in the list in the order listed so that:
(1) if a machine to be selected in the list is not scheduled to be
used in the upcoming election, the selection process will move to
the next machine in the order listed;
(2) each selected machine is scheduled to be used in the
upcoming election; and
(3) the number of machines selected is not less than five percent
(5%) of the machines in the county scheduled by the county
election board to be used in the upcoming election.
(b) The county election board shall test the machines as described
in subsection (a) to ascertain that the machines will correctly count the
votes cast for straight party tickets, for all candidates (including
write-in candidates) and on all public questions. If an individual
attending the public test requests that additional electronic voting
systems be tested, then the county election board shall select and test
additional machines from the list in the manner described in subsection
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(a).
(c) If VSTOP does not provide the lists under subsection (a) not
later than sixty (60) days before the election, the county election board
shall establish and implement a procedure for random selection of not
less than five percent (5%) of the machines in the county. The county
election board shall then test the machines selected to be used in the
upcoming election as described in subsection (b).
(d) The testing under subsection (b) must begin before absentee
voting starts in the office of the circuit court clerk under IC 3-11-10-26.
(e) If a county election board determines that:
(1) a ballot provided by an electronic voting system:
(A) must be corrected as provided by IC 3-11-2-16 because of
the omission of a candidate, political party, or public question
from the ballot; or
(B) is an absentee ballot that a voter is entitled to recast under
IC 3-11.5-4-2 because the absentee ballot includes a candidate
for election to office who:
(i) ceased to be a candidate; and
(ii) has been succeeded by a candidate selected under
IC 3-13-1 or IC 3-13-2; and
(2) machines used in the test conducted under this section did not
contain a ballot that was reprinted or corrected to remove the
omission of a candidate, political party, or public question, or
indicate the name of the successor candidate;
the county election board shall conduct an additional public test
described in subsection (b) using the machines previously tested and
containing the reprinted or corrected ballots.
SECTION 21. IC 3-12-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.64-2014,
SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. Subject to sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 9.5, and 13 of
this chapter, the primary factor to be considered in determining a
voter's choice on a ballot is the intent of the voter. If the voter's intent
can be determined on the ballot or on part of the ballot, the vote shall
be counted for the affected candidate or candidates or on the public
question. However, if it is impossible to determine a voter's choice of
candidates on a part of a ballot or vote on a public question, then the
voter's vote concerning those candidates or public questions may not
be counted.
SECTION 22. IC 3-12-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) This subsection does not apply to a ballot
card voting system or an electronic voting system. Except as provided
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


in subsection (d), A voting mark made by a voter on or in a voting
square at the left of a candidate's name or political party's name shall
be counted as a vote for the candidate. or candidates of the political
party.
(b) This subsection applies to a ballot card voting system. A voting
mark made by a voter:
(1) on or in a circle, oval, or square; or
(2) to connect a connectable arrow;
immediately below or beside a candidate's name or political party's
name shall be counted as a vote for the candidate. or candidates of the
political party, except as provided in subsection (d).
(c) This subsection applies to a direct record electronic voting
system. A voting mark made by a voter touching a touch sensitive point
or button below or beside a candidate's name or political party's name
shall be counted as a vote for the candidate. or candidates of the
political party, except as provided in subsection (d).
(d) A voter who wishes to cast a ballot for a candidate for election
to a school board office or an at-large district to which more than one
(1) person may be elected on a:
(1) county council;
(2) city common council;
(3) town council; or
(4) township board;
must make a voting mark for each individual candidate for whom the
voter wishes to cast a vote. A straight ticket voting mark on a paper
ballot, ballot card voting system, or electronic voting system shall not
be counted as a straight party ticket voting mark as a vote for any
candidate for an office described by this subsection.
SECTION 23. IC 3-12-1-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.21-2016,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) This subsection applies whenever a voter:
(1) votes a straight party ticket; and
(2) votes only for one (1) or more individual candidates who are
all of the same political party as the straight ticket vote.
Except as provided in subsection (d) or (e), the straight ticket vote shall
be counted and the individual candidate votes may not be counted.
(b) This subsection applies whenever:
(1) a voter has voted a straight party ticket for the candidates of
one (1) political party;
(2) only one (1) person may be elected to an office; and
(3) the voter has voted for one (1) individual candidate for the
office described in subdivision (2) who is:
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(A) a candidate of a political party other than the party for
which the voter voted a straight ticket; or
(B) an independent candidate or declared write-in candidate
for the office.
If the voter has voted for one (1) individual candidate for the office
described in subdivision (2), the individual candidate vote for that
office shall be counted, the straight party ticket vote for that office may
not be counted, and the straight party ticket votes for other offices on
the ballot shall be counted.
(c) This subsection applies whenever:
(1) a voter has voted a straight party ticket for the candidates of
one (1) political party; and
(2) the voter has voted for more individual candidates for the
office than the number of persons to be elected to that office.
The individual candidate votes for that office may not be counted, the
straight party ticket vote for that office may not be counted, and the
straight party ticket votes for other offices on the ballot shall be
counted.
(d) This subsection applies whenever:
(1) a voter has voted a straight party ticket for the candidates of
one (1) political party;
(2) more than one (1) person may be elected to an office; and
(3) the voter has voted for individual candidates for the office
described in subdivision (2) who are:
(A) independent candidates or declared write-in candidates;
(B) candidates of a political party other than the political party
for which the voter cast a straight party ticket under
subdivision (1); or
(C) a combination of candidates described in clauses (A) and
(B).
The individual votes cast by the voter for the office for the independent
candidates, declared write-in candidates, and the candidates of a
political party other than the political party for which the voter cast a
straight party ticket shall be counted unless the total number of these
individual votes is greater than the number of persons to be elected to
the office. The straight party ticket votes for the office shall not be
counted. The straight party ticket votes for other offices on the voter's
ballot shall be counted.
(e) This subsection applies whenever:
(1) a voter has voted a straight party ticket for the candidates of
one (1) political party;
(2) more than one (1) person may be elected to an office; and
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(3) the voter has voted for individual candidates for the office
described in subdivision (2) who are:
(A) independent candidates, declared write-in candidates, or
candidates of a political party other than the political party for
which the voter cast a straight party ticket under subdivision
(1); and
(B) candidates of the same political party for which the voter
cast a straight party ticket under subdivision (1).
The individual votes cast by the voter for the office for the independent
candidates, the declared write-in candidates, and the candidates of a
political party other than the political party for which the voter cast a
straight party ticket, and the candidates of the political party for which
the voter cast a straight party ticket shall be counted unless the total
number of these individual votes is greater than the number of persons
to be elected to the office. The straight party ticket votes for the office
shall not be counted. The straight party ticket votes for other offices on
the voter's ballot shall be counted.
(f) If a voter votes a straight party ticket for more than one (1)
political party, the whole ballot is void with regard to all candidates
nominated by a political party, declared write-in candidates, or
candidates designated as independent candidates on the ballot.
However, the voter's vote for a school board candidate or on a public
question shall be counted if otherwise valid under this chapter.
(g) (a) If a voter does not vote a straight party ticket and the number
of votes cast by that a voter for the candidates for an office are less
than or equal to the number of openings for that office, the individual
candidates votes shall be counted.
(h) (b) If a voter does not vote a straight party ticket and the number
of votes cast by that a voter for an office exceeds the number of
openings for that office, none of the votes concerning that office may
be counted.
SECTION 24. IC 3-12-1-7.1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 7.1. Notwithstanding section 7 of this chapter, a straight
party vote does not count for any candidate for a school board office.
SECTION 25. IC 3-12-1-7.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.21-2016,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) If a voter votes for one (1) individual
candidate for an office for which only one (1) person may be elected
and also writes in the name of another candidate for the same office,
neither vote may be counted.
(b) If a voter votes for at least one (1) individual candidate for an
office for which at least two (2) people may be elected and also writes
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


in the name of at least one (1) candidate, the vote for that office may
not be counted unless the number of individual votes cast for the office,
when added to the number of write-in votes cast for that office, is less
than or equal to the number of seats available for that office.
(c) If a voter votes an individual or a straight party vote for a
candidate for an office and also writes in the name of the same
candidate for the same office, only one (1) vote for that candidate may
be counted.
SECTION 26. IC 3-12-1-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a voting mark
made by a voter on or in a circle containing a political party device
shall be counted as a vote for each candidate of that political party on
that ballot.
(b) A voter who wishes to cast a ballot for a candidate for election
to a school board office or an at-large district to which more than one
(1) person may be elected on a:
(1) county council;
(2) city common council;
(3) town council; or
(4) township board;
must make a voting mark for each individual candidate for whom the
voter wishes to cast a vote. A voting mark on or in a circle containing
a political party device shall not be counted as a straight party ticket
voting mark as a vote for any candidate for an office described by this
subsection.
SECTION 27. IC 3-12-1-14 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) This section
does not apply to a vote
(1) cast for President or Vice President of the United States under
IC 3-10-4-6. or
(2) described by section 15 of this chapter.
(b) A vote cast for a candidate who ceases to be a candidate may not
be counted as a vote for a successor candidate selected under IC 3-13-1
or IC 3-13-2.
SECTION 28. IC 3-12-1-15 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 15. (a) This section does not apply to a candidate for a
school board office or an at-large office of a county council, city
common council, town council, or township board, if those offices
appear on a ballot.
(b) This section applies to a vote cast for one (1) straight party ticket
that includes a candidate for election to office who:
(1) ceases to be a candidate; and
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149


(2) is succeeded by a candidate selected under IC 3-13-1 or
IC 3-13-2.
(c) A vote cast in the election for the original nominee is considered
a vote cast for the successor.
2026 IN 1218—LS 6966/DI 149